Hawaii statutes.
§200-45 When public auction not required. Public
auction shall not be required when the appraised value of any vessel is less
than $5,000, as determined by an independent appraiser who has at least one
year of experience in the sale or purchase of vessels. Upon that
determination, after public notice of intended disposition has been given at
least once, the state or county agency that took custody of the vessel may sell
the vessel by negotiation, dispose of it as junk, or donate the vessel to any
governmental agency. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 70, §4; am L 2012,
c 146, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next